Ohio, session 136, SB422.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 2950.13, 2950.99, 3314.03, 3326.11, and 3328.24 be amended and sections 2950.036, 2950.044, and 3313.475 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 2950.036. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Legitimate purpose" means any of the following: (a) Picking up or dropping off the parent's or guardian's child prior to the start of or after the end of the school day or preschool or child care session; (b) Picking up or dropping off the parent's or guardian's child prior to the start of or after the end of a school-sponsored or preschool- or child care-sponsored activity, event, or program in which the child is a participant; (c) Picking up the parent's or guardian's child in the event of an emergency, when the child is ill, or for a medical appointment, or dropping off the child following a medical appointment; (d) Attending a parent-teacher conference or other meeting requested by a teacher, principal, administrator, or preschool or child care worker, or requested by the parent when permitted by state or federal law, so long as the meeting occurs during nonschool hours; (e) Attending public, civic, or community meetings held during nonschool hours on school premises or preschool or child care center premises, provided that no children are present at the meeting; (f) If the person is a student enrolled at the school, attending classroom instruction on a day that the school is in session, attending a parent-teacher conference or other meeting requested by a teacher, principal, administrator, or preschool or child care worker, or requested by the parent when permitted by state or federal law, or serving an in-school suspension as defined in section 3313.66 of the Revised Code; (g) Being on the premises for purposes of voting on the day of an election, if the person is a registered elector whose assigned polling place is located on school premises or preschool or child care center premises. (2) "Preschool or child care center premises" has the same meaning as in section 2950.034 of the Revised Code. (3) "School premises" includes any "school," "school building," or "school premises" as those terms are defined in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code. "School premises" also includes any parcel of real property or building that a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code owns or operates in the same manner as a board of education owns or operates a "school premises" or "school building" as those terms are defined in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code. (4) "Nonschool hours" has the same meaning as in section 3313.77 of the Revised Code. (5) "School-affiliated event" means an athletic event, play, musical, or any other school-related event or activity that a qualifying school conducts, sponsors, or participates in and for which a qualifying school charges admission to attend. "School-affiliated event" does not include any event or activity that is conducted in a facility otherwise open to the public unless the facility is closed to the public during the school-affiliated event. (6) "Qualified sex offender/child-victim offender" means a person who is either of the following: (a) A person who is convicted of, pleads guilty to, has been convicted of, or has pleaded guilty to a violation of division (B) of section 2905.05 or section 2907.07 of the Revised Code and who is classified a tier I sex offender/child-victim offender relative to that offense; (b) A person who is convicted of, pleads guilty to, has been convicted of, or has pleaded guilty to any sexually oriented offense listed in division (F) or (G) of section 2950.01 of the Revised Code and who is classified a tier II or tier III sex offender/child-victim offender relative to that offense. (B) No person who is eighteen years of age or older and who is a qualified sex offender/child-victim offender shall knowingly be present on any school premises or preschool or child care center premises or on premises where a school-affiliated ticketed event is occurring. (C) It is an affirmative defense to a charge under division (B) of this section that the person who is knowingly present on school premises or preschool or child care center premises is a student enrolled at the related school or is a parent or guardian of a child who attends the related school, preschool, or child care facility and is on the premises for a legitimate purpose. A defendant may not assert an affirmative defense under this division if the defendant previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to two or more violations of this section. (D) It is an affirmative defense to a charge under division (B) of this section that the person is enrolled as a student in the school district and is entitled to attend school under division (F)(1) of section 3313.64 of the Revised Code, including a student with a disability entitled to receive educational services until age twenty-two pursuant to an individualized education program. The school district shall impose reasonable safety and supervision conditions on the student's presence on school premises, but the student's right to attend school shall not be denied solely on the basis of classification as a sex offender or child-victim offender. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the right of a student with a disability to receive a free appropriate public education or the right of a student to attend school under division (F)(1) of section 3313.64 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2950.044. (A) As used in this section, "qualified sex offender/child-victim offender" has the same meaning as in section 2950.036 of the Revised Code. (B) A sheriff, or sheriff's designee, shall provide written notice to any qualified sex offender/child-victim offender who is prohibited from knowingly being on school premises or preschool or child care center premises under division (B) of section 2950.036 of the Revised Code of the prohibitions contained in section 2950.036 of the Revised Code. The written notice shall include a statement of the legitimate purposes specified under division (A)(1) of section 2950.036 of the Revised Code for which the offender may be present on school premises or preschool or child care center premises, and the definitions of "school premises," "child care center premises," and "nonschool hours" as defined in section 2950.036 of the Revised Code. (C) A sheriff or sheriff's designee shall provide the notice to a qualified sex offender/child-victim offender subject to the prohibition under division (B) of section 2950.036 of the Revised Code at the time of the offender's initial registration under section 2950.04, 2950.041, 2950.05, or 2950.06 of the Revised Code, or, if the offender is registered with a sheriff or sheriff's designee under Chapter 2950. of the Revised Code as of the effective date of this section, a sheriff or sheriff's designee shall provide the notice to the offender at the time of a sheriff's or sheriff designee's next contact with the offender under Chapter 2950. of the Revised Code. Sec. 2950.13. (A) The attorney general shall do all of the following: (1) No later than July 1, 1997, establish and maintain a state registry of sex offenders and child-victim offenders that is housed at the bureau of criminal identification and investigation and that contains all of the registration, change of residence, school, institution of higher education, or place of employment address, and verification information the bureau receives pursuant to sections 2950.04, 2950.041, 2950.05, and 2950.06 of the Revised Code regarding each person who is convicted of, pleads guilty to, has been convicted of, or has pleaded guilty to a sexually oriented offense or a child-victim oriented offense and each person who is or has been adjudicated a delinquent child for committing a sexually oriented offense or a child-victim oriented offense and is classified a juvenile offender registrant or is an out-of-state juvenile offender registrant based on that adjudication, all of the information the bureau receives pursuant to section 2950.14 of the Revised Code, and any notice of an order terminating or modifying an offender's or delinquent child's duty to comply with sections 2950.04, 2950.041, 2950.05, and 2950.06 of the Revised Code the bureau receives pursuant to section 2152.84, 2152.85, or 2950.15 of the Revised Code. For a person who was convicted of or pleaded guilty to the sexually oriented offense or child-victim related offense, the registry also shall indicate whether the person was convicted of or pleaded guilty to the offense in a criminal prosecution or in a serious youthful offender case. The registry shall not be open to inspection by the public or by any person other than a person identified in division (A) of section 2950.08 of the Revised Code. In addition to the information and material previously identified in this division, the registry shall include all of the following regarding each person who is listed in the registry: (a) A citation for, and the name of, all sexually oriented offenses or child-victim oriented offenses of which the person was convicted, to which the person pleaded guilty, or for which the person was adjudicated a delinquent child and that resulted in a registration duty, and the date on which those offenses were committed, and a statement as to whether any of those offenses are an offense included in the definition of "qualified sex offender/child-victim offender" as that term is defined in section 2950.036 of the Revised Code; (b) The text of the sexually oriented offenses or child-victim oriented offenses identified in division (A)(1)(a) of this section as those offenses existed at the time the person was convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or was adjudicated a delinquent child for committing those offenses, or a link to a database that sets forth the text of those offenses; (c) A statement as to whether the person is a tier I sex offender/child-victim offender, a tier II sex offender/child-victim offender, or a tier III sex offender/child-victim offender for the sexually oriented offenses or child-victim oriented offenses identified in division (A)(1)(a) of this section; (d) The community supervision status of the person, including, but not limited to, whether the person is serving a community control sanction and the nature of any such sanction, whether the person is under supervised release and the nature of the release, or regarding a juvenile, whether the juvenile is under any type of release authorized under Chapter 2152. or 5139. of the Revised Code and the nature of any such release; (e) The offense and delinquency history of the person, as determined from information gathered or provided under sections 109.57 and 2950.14 of the Revised Code; (f) The bureau of criminal identification and investigation tracking number assigned to the person if one has been so assigned, the federal bureau of investigation number assigned to the person if one has been assigned and the bureau of criminal identification and investigation is aware of the number, and any other state identification number assigned to the person of which the bureau is aware; (g) Fingerprints and palmprints of the person; (h) A DNA specimen, as defined in section 109.573 of the Revised Code, from the person; (i) Whether the person has any outstanding arrest warrants; (j) Whether the person is in compliance with the person's duties under this chapter. (2) In consultation with local law enforcement representatives and no later than July 1, 1997, adopt rules that contain guidelines necessary for the implementation of this chapter; (3) In consultation with local law enforcement representatives, adopt rules for the implementation and administration of the provisions contained in section 2950.11 of the Revised Code that pertain to the notification of neighbors of an offender or a delinquent child who has committed a sexually oriented offense or a child-victim oriented offense and is in a category specified in division (F)(1) of that section and rules that prescribe a manner in which victims of a sexually oriented offense or a child-victim oriented offense committed by an offender or a delinquent child who is in a category specified in division (B)(1) of section 2950.10 of the Revised Code may make a request that specifies that the victim would like to be provided the notices described in divisions (A)(1) and (2) of section 2950.10 of the Revised Code; (4) In consultation with local law enforcement representatives and through the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, prescribe the forms to be used by judges and officials pursuant to section 2950.03 or 2950.032 of the Revised Code to advise offenders and delinquent children of their duties of filing a notice of intent to reside, registration, notification of a change of residence, school, institution of higher education, or place of employment address and registration of the new school, institution of higher education, or place of employment address, as applicable, and address verification under sections 2950.04, 2950.041, 2950.05, and 2950.06 of the Revised Code, and prescribe the forms to be used by sheriffs relative to those duties of filing a notice of intent to reside, registration, change of residence, school, institution of higher education, or place of employment address notification, and address verification; (5) Make copies of the forms prescribed under division (A)(4) of this section available to judges, officials, and sheriffs; (6) Through the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, provide the notifications, the information and materials, and the documents that the bureau is required to provide to appropriate law enforcement officials and to the federal bureau of investigation pursuant to sections 2950.04, 2950.041, 2950.05, and 2950.06 of the Revised Code; (7) Through the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, maintain the verification forms returned under the address verification mechanism set forth in section 2950.06 of the Revised Code; (8) In consultation with representatives of the officials, judges, and sheriffs, adopt procedures for officials, judges, and sheriffs to use to forward information, photographs, and fingerprints to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation pursuant to the requirements of sections 2950.03, 2950.04, 2950.041, 2950.05, 2950.06, and 2950.11 of the Revised Code; (9) In consultation with the director of education, the director of children and youth, and the director of rehabilitation and correction, adopt rules that contain guidelines to be followed by boards of education of a school district, chartered nonpublic schools or other schools not operated by a board of education, preschool programs, child care centers, type A family child care homes, licensed type B family child care homes, and institutions of higher education regarding the proper use and administration of information received pursuant to section 2950.11 of the Revised Code relative to an offender or delinquent child who has committed a sexually oriented offense or a child-victim oriented offense and is in a category specified in division (F)(1) of that section; (10) In consultation with local law enforcement representatives and no later than July 1, 1997, adopt rules that designate a geographic area or areas within which the notice described in division (B) of section 2950.11 of the Revised Code must be given to the persons identified in divisions (A)(2) to (8) and (A)(10) of that section; (11) Through the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, not later than January 1, 2004, establish and operate on the internet a sex offender and child-victim offender database that contains information for every offender who has committed a sexually oriented offense or a child-victim oriented offense and registers in any county in this state pursuant to section 2950.04 or 2950.041 of the Revised Code and for every delinquent child who has committed a sexually oriented offense, is a public registry-qualified juvenile offender registrant, and registers in any county in this state pursuant to either such section. The bureau shall not include on the database the identity of any offender's or public registry-qualified juvenile offender registrant's victim, any offender's or public registry-qualified juvenile offender registrant's social security number, the name of any school or institution of higher education attended by any offender or public registry-qualified juvenile offender registrant, the name of the place of employment of any offender or public registry-qualified juvenile offender registrant, any tracking or identification number described in division (A)(1)(f) of this section, or any information described in division (C)(7) of section 2950.04 or 2950.041 of the Revised Code. The bureau shall provide on the database, for each offender and each public registry-qualified juvenile offender registrant, at least the information specified in divisions (A)(11)(a) to (h) of this section. Otherwise, the bureau shall determine the information to be provided on the database for each offender and public registry-qualified juvenile offender registrant and shall obtain that information from the information contained in the state registry of sex offenders and child-victim offenders described in division (A)(1) of this section, which information, while in the possession of the sheriff who provided it, is a public record open for inspection as described in section 2950.081 of the Revised Code. The bureau shall include in the public record the identity of any registered offender who is a "qualified sex offender/child-victim offender" as that term is defined in section 2950.036 of the Revised Code. The database is a public record open for inspection under section 149.43 of the Revised Code, and it shall be searchable by offender or public registry-qualified juvenile offender registrant name, by county, by zip code, and by school district. The database shall provide a link to the web site of each sheriff who has established and operates on the internet a sex offender and child-victim offender database that contains information for offenders and public registry-qualified juvenile offender registrants who register in that county pursuant to section 2950.04 or 2950.041 of the Revised Code, with the link being a direct link to the sex offender and child-victim offender database for the sheriff. The bureau shall provide on the database, for each offender and public registry-qualified juvenile offender registrant, at least the following information: (a) The information described in divisions (A)(1)(a), (b), (c), and (d) of this section relative to the offender or public registry-qualified juvenile offender registrant; (b) The address of the offender's or public registry-qualified juvenile offender registrant's school, institution of higher education, or place of employment provided in a registration form; (c) The information described in division (C)(6) of section 2950.04 or 2950.041 of the Revised Code; (d) A chart describing which sexually oriented offenses and child-victim oriented offenses are included in the definitions of tier I sex offender/child-victim offender, tier II sex offender/child-victim offender, and tier III sex offender/child-victim offender; (e) Fingerprints and palmprints of the offender or public registry-qualified juvenile offender registrant and a DNA specimen from the offender or public registry-qualified juvenile offender registrant; (f) The information set forth in division (B) of section 2950.11 of the Revised Code; (g) Any outstanding arrest warrants for the offender or public registry-qualified juvenile offender registrant; (h) The offender's or public registry-qualified juvenile offender registrant's compliance status with duties under this chapter. (12) Develop software to be used by sheriffs in establishing on the internet a sex offender and child-victim offender database for the public dissemination of some or all of the information and materials described in division (A) of section 2950.081 of the Revised Code that are public records under that division, that are not prohibited from inclusion by division (B) of that section, and that pertain to offenders and public registry-qualified juvenile offender registrants who register in the sheriff's county pursuant to section 2950.04 or 2950.041 of the Revised Code and for the public dissemination of information the sheriff receives pursuant to section 2950.14 of the Revised Code and, upon the request of any sheriff, provide technical guidance to the requesting sheriff in establishing on the internet such a database; (13) Through the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, not later than January 1, 2004, establish and operate on the internet a database that enables local law enforcement representatives to remotely search by electronic means the state registry of sex offenders and child-victim offenders described in division (A)(1) of this section and any information and materials the bureau receives pursuant to sections 2950.04, 2950.041, 2950.05, 2950.06, and 2950.14 of the Revised Code. The database shall enable local law enforcement representatives to obtain detailed information regarding each offender and delinquent child who is included in the registry, including, but not limited to the offender's or delinquent child's name, aliases, residence address, name and address of any place of employment, school, institution of higher education, if applicable, license plate number of each vehicle identified in division (C)(5) of section 2950.04 or 2950.041 of the Revised Code to the extent applicable, victim preference if available, date of most recent release from confinement if applicable, fingerprints, and palmprints, all of the information and material described in divisions (A)(1)(a) to (h) of this section regarding the offender or delinquent child, and other identification parameters the bureau considers appropriate. The database is not a public record open for inspection under section 149.43 of the Revised Code and shall be available only to law enforcement representatives as described in this division. Information obtained by local law enforcement representatives through use of this database is not open to inspection by the public or by any person other than a person identified in division (A) of section 2950.08 of the Revised Code. (14) Through the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, maintain a list of requests for notice about a specified offender or delinquent child or specified geographical notification area made pursuant to division (J) of section 2950.11 of the Revised Code and, when an offender or delinquent child changes residence to another county, forward any requests for information about that specific offender or delinquent child to the appropriate sheriff; (15) Through the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, establish and operate a system for the immediate notification by electronic means of the appropriate officials in other states specified in this division each time an offender or delinquent child registers a residence, school, institution of higher education, or place of employment address under section 2950.04 or 2950.041 of the Revised Code or provides a notice of a change of address or registers a new address under division (A) or (B) of section 2950.05 of the Revised Code. The immediate notification by electronic means shall be provided to the appropriate officials in each state in which the offender or delinquent child is required to register a residence, school, institution of higher education, or place of employment address. The notification shall contain the offender's or delinquent child's name and all of the information the bureau receives from the sheriff with whom the offender or delinquent child registered the address or provided the notice of change of address or registered the new address. (B) The attorney general in consultation with local law enforcement representatives, may adopt rules that establish one or more categories of neighbors of an offender or delinquent child who, in addition to the occupants of residential premises and other persons specified in division (A)(1) of section 2950.11 of the Revised Code, must be given the notice described in division (B) of that section. (C) No person, other than a local law enforcement representative, shall knowingly do any of the following: (1) Gain or attempt to gain access to the database established and operated by the attorney general, through the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, pursuant to division (A)(13) of this section. (2) Permit any person to inspect any information obtained through use of the database described in division (C)(1) of this section, other than as permitted under that division. (D) As used in this section, "local law enforcement representatives" means representatives of the sheriffs of this state, representatives of the municipal chiefs of police and marshals of this state, and representatives of the township constables and chiefs of police of the township police departments or police district police forces of this state. Sec. 2950.99. (A)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(1)(b) of this section, whoever violates a prohibition in section 2950.04, 2950.041, 2950.05, or 2950.06 of the Revised Code shall be punished as follows: (i) If the most serious sexually oriented offense that was the basis of the registration, notice of intent to reside, change of address notification, or address verification requirement that was violated under the prohibition is aggravated murder or murder if committed by an adult or a comparable category of offense committed in another jurisdiction, the offender is guilty of a felony of the first degree. (ii) If the most serious sexually oriented offense or child-victim oriented offense that was the basis of the registration, notice of intent to reside, change of address notification, or address verification requirement that was violated under the prohibition is a felony of the first, second, third, or fourth degree if committed by an adult or a comparable category of offense committed in another jurisdiction, the offender is guilty of a felony of the same degree as the most serious sexually oriented offense or child-victim oriented offense that was the basis of the registration, notice of intent to reside, change of address, or address verification requirement that was violated under the prohibition, or, if the most serious sexually oriented offense or child-victim oriented offense that was the basis of the registration, notice of intent to reside, change of address, or address verification requirement that was violated under the prohibition is a comparable category of offense committed in another jurisdiction, the offender is guilty of a felony of the same degree as that offense committed in the other jurisdiction would constitute if committed in this state. (iii) If the most serious sexually oriented offense or child-victim oriented offense that was the basis of the registration, notice of intent to reside, change of address notification, or address verification requirement that was violated under the prohibition is a felony of the fifth degree or a misdemeanor if committed by an adult or a comparable category of offense committed in another jurisdiction, the offender is guilty of a felony of the fourth degree. (b) If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to, or previously has been adjudicated a delinquent child for committing, a violation of a prohibition in section 2950.04, 2950.041, 2950.05, or 2950.06 of the Revised Code, whoever violates a prohibition in section 2950.04, 2950.041, 2950.05, or 2950.06 of the Revised Code shall be punished as follows: (i) If the most serious sexually oriented offense that was the basis of the registration, notice of intent to reside, change of address notification, or address verification requirement that was violated under the prohibition is aggravated murder or murder if committed by an adult or a comparable category of offense committed in another jurisdiction, the offender is guilty of a felony of the first degree. (ii) If the most serious sexually oriented offense or child-victim oriented offense that was the basis of the registration, notice of intent to reside, change of address notification, or address verification requirement that was violated under the prohibition is a felony of the first, second, or third degree if committed by an adult or a comparable category of offense committed in another jurisdiction, the offender is guilty of a felony of the same degree as the most serious sexually oriented offense or child-victim oriented offense that was the basis of the registration, notice of intent to reside, change of address, or address verification requirement that was violated under the prohibition, or, if the most serious sexually oriented offense or child-victim oriented offense that was the basis of the registration, notice of intent to reside, change of address, or address verification requirement that was violated under the prohibition is a comparable category of offense committed in another jurisdiction, the offender is guilty of a felony of the same degree as that offense committed in the other jurisdiction would constitute if committed in this state. (iii) If the most serious sexually oriented offense or child-victim oriented offense that was the basis of the registration, notice of intent to reside, change of address notification, or address verification requirement that was violated under the prohibition is a felony of the fourth or fifth degree if committed by an adult or a comparable category of offense committed in another jurisdiction, the offender is guilty of a felony of the third degree. (iv) If the most serious sexually oriented offense or child-victim oriented offense that was the basis of the registration, notice of intent to reside, change of address notification, or address verification requirement that was violated under the prohibition is a misdemeanor if committed by an adult or a comparable category of offense committed in another jurisdiction, the offender is guilty of a felony of the fourth degree. (2)(a) In addition to any penalty or sanction imposed under division (A)(1) of this section or any other provision of law for a violation of a prohibition in section 2950.04, 2950.041, 2950.05, or 2950.06 of the Revised Code, if the offender or delinquent child is subject to a community control sanction, is on parole, is subject to one or more post-release control sanctions, or is subject to any other type of supervised release at the time of the violation, the violation shall constitute a violation of the terms and conditions of the community control sanction, parole, post-release control sanction, or other type of supervised release. (b) In addition to any penalty or sanction imposed under division (A)(1)(b)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this section or any other provision of law for a violation of a prohibition in section 2950.04, 2950.041, 2950.05, or 2950.06 of the Revised Code, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to, or previously has been adjudicated a delinquent child for committing, a violation of a prohibition in section 2950.04, 2950.041, 2950.05, or 2950.06 of the Revised Code when the most serious sexually oriented offense or child-victim oriented offense that was the basis of the requirement that was violated under the prohibition is a felony if committed by an adult or a comparable category of offense committed in another jurisdiction, the court imposing a sentence upon the offender shall impose a definite prison term of no less than three years. The definite prison term imposed under this section shall not be reduced to less than three years pursuant to any provision of Chapter 2967. or any other provision of the Revised Code. (3) As used in division (A)(1) of this section, "comparable category of offense committed in another jurisdiction" means a sexually oriented offense or child-victim oriented offense that was the basis of the registration, notice of intent to reside, change of address notification, or address verification requirement that was violated, that is a violation of an existing or former law of another state or the United States, an existing or former law applicable in a military court or in an Indian tribal court, or an existing or former law of any nation other than the United States, and that, if it had been committed in this state, would constitute or would have constituted aggravated murder or murder for purposes of division (A)(1)(a)(i) of this section, a felony of the first, second, third, or fourth degree for purposes of division (A)(1)(a)(ii) of this section, a felony of the fifth degree or a misdemeanor for purposes of division (A)(1)(a)(iii) of this section, aggravated murder or murder for purposes of division (A)(1)(b)(i) of this section, a felony of the first, second, or third degree for purposes of division (A)(1)(b)(ii) of this section, a felony of the fourth or fifth degree for purposes of division (A)(1)(b)(iii) of this section, or a misdemeanor for purposes of division (A)(1)(b)(iv) of this section. (B) If a person violates a prohibition in section 2950.04, 2950.041, 2950.05, or 2950.06 of the Revised Code that applies to the person as a result of the person being adjudicated a delinquent child and being classified a juvenile offender registrant or an out-of-state juvenile offender registrant, both of the following apply: (1) If the violation occurs while the person is under eighteen years of age, the person is subject to proceedings under Chapter 2152. of the Revised Code based on the violation. (2) If the violation occurs while the person is eighteen years of age or older, the person is subject to criminal prosecution based on the violation. (C) Whoever violates division (C) of section 2950.13 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (D) Whoever violates division (A)(2) of section 2950.035 of the Revised Code shall be punished as follows: (1) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(2) or (3) of this section, the offender is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (2) If the offender once previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of division (A)(2) of section 2950.035 of the Revised Code, the offender is guilty of a felony of the third degree. (3) If the offender two or more times previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of division (A)(2) of section 2950.035 of the Revised Code, the offender is guilty of a felony of the first degree. (E) Whoever violates section 2950.036 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree on a first offense, a misdemeanor of the first degree on a second offense, and a felony of the fifth degree on each subsequent offense. Sec. 3313.475. Each school district and chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school shall, as determined necessary by the school district superintendent, chief administrator of the chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school, or the superintendent's or chief administrator's designee, provide reasonable off-site or remote alternatives for meetings and communications with parents who are prohibited from knowingly being present on school premises under section 2950.036 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the right of a student with a disability to receive a free appropriate public education or the right of a student to attend school under division (F)(1) of section 3313.64 of the Revised Code. A school district may implement an individualized safety plan. Sec. 3314.03. A copy of every contract entered into under this section shall be filed with the director of education and workforce. The department of education and workforce shall make available on its web site a copy of every approved, executed contract filed with the director under this section. (A) Each contract entered into between a sponsor and the governing authority of a community school shall specify the following: (1) That the school shall be established as either of the following: (a) A nonprofit corporation established under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code, if established prior to April 8, 2003; (b) A public benefit corporation established under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code, if established after April 8, 2003. (2) The education program of the school, including the school's mission and educational philosophy, the characteristics of the students the school is expected to attract, the ages and grades of students, and the focus of the curriculum; (3) The academic goals to be achieved and the method of measurement that will be used to determine progress toward those goals, which shall include the statewide achievement assessments; (4) Performance standards, including but not limited to all applicable report card measures set forth in section 3302.03 or 3314.017 of the Revised Code, by which the success of the school will be evaluated by the sponsor; (5) The admission standards of section 3314.06 of the Revised Code and, if applicable, section 3314.061 of the Revised Code; (6)(a) Dismissal procedures; (b) A requirement that the governing authority adopt an attendance policy that includes a procedure for automatically withdrawing a student from the school if the student without a legitimate excuse fails to participate in seventy-two consecutive hours of the learning opportunities offered to the student. (7) The ways by which the school will achieve racial and ethnic balance reflective of the community it serves; (8) Requirements for financial audits by the auditor of state. The contract shall require financial records of the school to be maintained in the same manner as are financial records of school districts, pursuant to rules of the auditor of state. Audits shall be conducted in accordance with section 117.10 of the Revised Code. (9) An addendum to the contract outlining the facilities to be used that contains at least the following information: (a) A detailed description of each facility used for instructional purposes; (b) The annual costs associated with leasing each facility that are paid by or on behalf of the school; (c) The annual mortgage principal and interest payments that are paid by the school; (d) The name of the lender or landlord, identified as such, and the lender's or landlord's relationship to the operator, if any. (10) Qualifications of employees, including both of the following: (a) A requirement that the school's classroom teachers be licensed in accordance with sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the Revised Code, except that a community school may engage noncertificated persons to teach up to twelve hours or forty hours per week pursuant to section 3319.301 of the Revised Code; (b) A prohibition against the school employing an individual described in section 3314.104 of the Revised Code in any position. (11) That the school will comply with the following requirements: (a) The school will provide learning opportunities to a minimum of twenty-five students for a minimum of nine hundred twenty hours per school year. (b) The governing authority will purchase liability insurance, or otherwise provide for the potential liability of the school. (c) The school will be nonsectarian in its programs, admission policies, employment practices, and all other operations, and will not be operated by a sectarian school or religious institution. (d) The school will comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.24, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.472, 3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.475, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.609, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.8110, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.46, 3319.90, 3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 117., 1347., 2744., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district and will comply with section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code in the manner specified in section 3314.17 of the Revised Code. (e) The school shall comply with Chapter 102. and section 2921.42 of the Revised Code. (f) The school will comply with sections 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.617, 3313.618, and 3313.6114 of the Revised Code, except that for students who enter ninth grade for the first time before July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the curriculum in any high school prior to receiving a high school diploma may be met by completing the curriculum adopted by the governing authority of the community school rather than the curriculum specified in Title XXXIII of the Revised Code or any rules of the department. Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the curriculum of a high school prior to receiving a high school diploma shall be met by completing the requirements prescribed in section 3313.6027 and division (C) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code, unless the person qualifies under division (D) or (F) of that section. Each school shall comply with the plan for awarding high school credit based on demonstration of subject area competency, and beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, with the updated plan that permits students enrolled in seventh and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on subject area competency adopted by the department under divisions (J)(1) and (2) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, the school shall comply with the framework for granting units of high school credit to students who demonstrate subject area competency through work-based learning experiences, internships, or cooperative education developed by the department under division (J)(3) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. (g) The school governing authority will submit within four months after the end of each school year a report of its activities and progress in meeting the goals and standards of divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section and its financial status to the sponsor and the parents of all students enrolled in the school. (h) The school, unless it is an internet- or computer-based community school, will comply with section 3313.801 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. (i) If the school is the recipient of moneys from a grant awarded under the federal race to the top program, Division (A), Title XIV, Sections 14005 and 14006 of the "American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009," Pub. L. No. 111-5, 123 Stat. 115, the school will pay teachers based upon performance in accordance with section 3317.141 and will comply with section 3319.111 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. (j) If the school operates a preschool program that is licensed by the department under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code, the school shall comply with sections 3301.50 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code and the minimum standards for preschool programs prescribed in rules adopted by the department of children and youth under section 3301.53 of the Revised Code. (k) The school will comply with sections 3313.6021 and 3313.6023 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district unless it is either of the following: (i) An internet- or computer-based community school; (ii) A community school in which a majority of the enrolled students are children with disabilities as described in division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. (l) The school will comply with section 3321.191 of the Revised Code, unless it is an internet- or computer-based community school that is subject to section 3314.261 of the Revised Code. (m) The school will comply with section 3313.7118 of the Revised Code if it serves elementary school students. (12) Arrangements for providing health and other benefits to employees; (13) The length of the contract, which shall begin at the beginning of an academic year. No contract shall exceed five years unless such contract has been renewed pursuant to division (D) of this section. (14) The governing authority of the school, which shall be responsible for carrying out the provisions of the contract; (15) A financial plan detailing an estimated school budget for each year of the period of the contract and specifying the total estimated per pupil expenditure amount for each such year. (16) Requirements and procedures regarding the disposition of employees of the school in the event the contract is terminated or not renewed pursuant to section 3314.07 of the Revised Code; (17) Whether the school is to be created by converting all or part of an existing public school or educational service center building or is to be a new start-up school, and if it is a converted public school or service center building, both of the following: (a) Specification of any duties or responsibilities of an employer that the board of education or service center governing board that operated the school or building before conversion is delegating to the governing authority of the community school with respect to all or any specified group of employees provided the delegation is not prohibited by a collective bargaining agreement applicable to such employees; (b) Alternative arrangements for current public school students who choose not to attend the converted school and for teachers who choose not to teach in the school or building after conversion. (18) Provisions establishing procedures for resolving disputes or differences of opinion between the sponsor and the governing authority of the community school; (19) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt a policy regarding the admission of students who reside outside the district in which the school is located. That policy shall comply with the admissions procedures specified in sections 3314.06 and 3314.061 of the Revised Code and, at the sole discretion of the authority, shall do one of the following: (a) Prohibit the enrollment of students who reside outside the district in which the school is located; (b) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in districts adjacent to the district in which the school is located; (c) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in any other district in the state. (20) A provision recognizing the authority of the department to take over the sponsorship of the school in accordance with the provisions of division (C) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code; (21) A provision recognizing the sponsor's authority to assume the operation of a school under the conditions specified in division (B) of section 3314.073 of the Revised Code; (22) A provision recognizing both of the following: (a) The authority of public health and safety officials to inspect the facilities of the school and to order the facilities closed if those officials find that the facilities are not in compliance with health and safety laws and regulations; (b) The authority of the department as the community school oversight body to suspend the operation of the school under section 3314.072 of the Revised Code if the department has evidence of conditions or violations of law at the school that pose an imminent danger to the health and safety of the school's students and employees and the sponsor refuses to take such action. (23) A description of the learning opportunities that will be offered to students including both classroom-based and non-classroom-based learning opportunities that is in compliance with criteria for student participation established by the department under division (H)(2) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code; (24) The school will comply with sections 3302.04 and 3302.041 of the Revised Code, except that any action required to be taken by a school district pursuant to those sections shall be taken by the sponsor of the school. (25) Beginning in the 2006-2007 school year, the school will open for operation not later than the thirtieth day of September each school year, unless the mission of the school as specified under division (A)(2) of this section is solely to serve dropouts. In its initial year of operation, if the school fails to open by the thirtieth day of September, or within one year after the adoption of the contract pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code if the mission of the school is solely to serve dropouts, the contract shall be void. (26) Whether the school's governing authority is planning to seek designation for the school as a STEM school equivalent under section 3326.032 of the Revised Code; (27) That the school's attendance and participation policies will be available for public inspection; (28) That the school's attendance and participation records shall be made available to the department, auditor of state, and school's sponsor to the extent permitted under and in accordance with the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974," 88 Stat. 571, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, and any regulations promulgated under that act, and section 3319.321 of the Revised Code; (29) If a school operates using the blended learning model, as defined in section 3301.079 of the Revised Code, all of the following information: (a) An indication of what blended learning model or models will be used; (b) A description of how student instructional needs will be determined and documented; (c) The method to be used for determining competency, granting credit, and promoting students to a higher grade level; (d) The school's attendance requirements, including how the school will document participation in learning opportunities; (e) A statement describing how student progress will be monitored; (f) A statement describing how private student data will be protected; (g) A description of the professional development activities that will be offered to teachers. (30) A provision requiring that all moneys the school's operator loans to the school, including facilities loans or cash flow assistance, must be accounted for, documented, and bear interest at a fair market rate; (31) A provision requiring that, if the governing authority contracts with an attorney, accountant, or entity specializing in audits, the attorney, accountant, or entity shall be independent from the operator with which the school has contracted. (32) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt an enrollment and attendance policy that requires a student's parent to notify the community school in which the student is enrolled when there is a change in the location of the parent's or student's primary residence. (33) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt a student residence and address verification policy for students enrolling in or attending the school. (34) A provision establishing the process by which the governing authority of the school will be selected in the future. (35) A description of the management and administration of the school. (36) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt policies and procedures to establish internal financial controls for the school. (B) A contract entered into under section 3314.02 of the Revised Code between a sponsor and the governing authority of a community school may provide for the community school governing authority to make payments to the sponsor, which is hereby authorized to receive such payments as set forth in the contract between the governing authority and the sponsor. The total amount of such payments for monitoring, oversight, and technical assistance of the school shall not exceed three per cent of the total amount of payments for operating expenses that the school receives from the state. (C) The contract shall specify the duties of the sponsor which shall be in accordance with the written agreement entered into with the department under division (B) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code and shall include the following: (1) Monitor the community school's compliance with all laws applicable to the school and with the terms of the contract; (2) Monitor and evaluate the academic and fiscal performance and the organization and operation of the community school on at least an annual basis; (3) Provide technical assistance to the community school in complying with laws applicable to the school and terms of the contract; (4) Take steps to intervene in the school's operation to correct problems in the school's overall performance, declare the school to be on probationary status pursuant to section 3314.073 of the Revised Code, suspend the operation of the school pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code, or terminate the contract of the school pursuant to section 3314.07 of the Revised Code as determined necessary by the sponsor; (5) Have in place a plan of action to be undertaken in the event the community school experiences financial difficulties or closes prior to the end of a school year. (D) Upon the expiration of a contract entered into under this section, the sponsor of a community school may, with the approval of the governing authority of the school, renew that contract for a period of time determined by the sponsor, but not ending earlier than the end of any school year, if the sponsor finds that the school's compliance with applicable laws and terms of the contract and the school's progress in meeting the academic goals prescribed in the contract have been satisfactory. Any contract that is renewed under this division remains subject to the provisions of sections 3314.07, 3314.072, and 3314.073 of the Revised Code. (E) If a community school fails to open for operation within one year after the contract entered into under this section is adopted pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code or permanently closes prior to the expiration of the contract, the contract shall be void and the school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor. A school shall not be considered permanently closed because the operations of the school have been suspended pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3326.11. Each science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under this chapter and its governing body shall comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 2921.42, 2921.43, 3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.24, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.14, 3313.15, 3313.16, 3313.18, 3313.201, 3313.26, 3313.472, 3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.475, 3313.48, 3313.481, 3313.482, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.615, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.717, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.7118, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.801, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.8110, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.21, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.32, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.35, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.45, 3319.46, 3319.614, 3319.90, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.05, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3321.191, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 102., 117., 1347., 2744., 3307., 3309., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. Sec. 3328.24. A college-preparatory boarding school established under this chapter and its board of trustees shall comply with sections 102.02, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0714, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.474, 3313.475, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.6013, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.717, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.8110, 3313.89, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.318, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.46, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3323.251, and 5502.262, and Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code as if the school were a school district and the school's board of trustees were a district board of education. Section 2. That existing sections 2950.13, 2950.99, 3314.03, 3326.11, and 3328.24 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections as presented in this act: Section 2950.99 of the Revised Code as amended by both S.B. 16 and S.B. 288 of the 134th General Assembly. Section 3314.03 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 10 and H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. Section 3326.11 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 10 and H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. Section 3328.24 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 10 and H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly.